Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4228.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1308f. (1) The department of state police and the office of school safety within the department of state police shall develop school safety and security training material and provide annual training on all of the following topics to school resource officers placed in public schools or nonpublic schools, school safety or security personnel who work at or for a public school or nonpublic school, and all school staff of public schools and nonpublic schools: (a) For school resource officers, position-specific training that is additional to any training received by the school resource officer to become a law enforcement officer. (b) An operational guide that provides actionable steps that schools can take to develop comprehensive targeted violence prevention plans for conducting threat assessments in schools created by the United States Secret Service National Threat Assessment Center (NTAC). (c) Target hardening. (d) Familiarity with law enforcement response to school emergencies. (e) The confidential safety tip line process administered by the OK2Say program or a successor state program. As used in this subdivision, "OK2Say program" means this state's student safety program that allows students to confidentially report tips on potential harm or criminal activities directed at students, school employees, and schools. (f) Emergency operations plans and emergency response procedures. (g) Incident command systems. (2) The department shall develop school safety and security training material and provide annual training on all of the following topics for all school resource officers placed in public schools or nonpublic schools, school safety or security personnel who work at or for a public school or nonpublic school, and all school staff of public schools and nonpublic schools: (a) Communication skills. (b) De-escalation tactics and techniques. (c) Physical controls for K to 12 educational institutions. (d) Cultural competence. (e) Mandatory reporting protocols. (f) Crisis intervention and prevention. (g) Mental health services. (3) The department of attorney general shall develop school safety and security training material and provide annual training on both of the following topics for all school resource officers placed in public schools or nonpublic schools and school safety or security personnel who work at or for a public school or nonpublic school: (a) Coverage of legal updates to aid in an officer's understanding of the limits and scope of the officer's authority in the school environment. (b) The legal authority and limitations of security personnel who are not licensed under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615.